Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2312.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-120.08, to read: START_STATUTE15-120.08. Patriotic youth groups; school access; discrimination prohibited; definition A. During the first quarter of each academic school year, the principal of a public school may allow representatives from any patriotic youth group to address students, AS DETERMINED BY THE PRINCIPAL, during regular school hours about how the patriotic youth group supports educational interests and civic involvement. A representative of the patriotic youth group that SEEKS to address students at a public school shall submit a verbal or written request to the principal during the first two weeks of the academic school year.  After receiving the request, the principal may provide the patriotic youth group with verbal or written approval that includes the date and time the representative of the patriotic youth group may address the students. B. The principal of a public school MAY ACCEPT MATERIALS THAT ARE PROVIDED BY A PATRIOTIC YOUTH GROUP OR ITS REPRESENTATIVES FOR DISTRIBUTION TO STUDENTS. iF THE PRINCIPAL ACCEPTS MATERIALS PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION, THE PRINCIPAL shall ensure that THE materials are distributed directly to students on school property. The principal may request prior access to the materials for approval and may determine the method of distribution directly to students. C. A public school may not deny equal access or a fair opportunity to meet to, or discriminate against, any patriotic youth group that wishes to conduct a meeting within that designated open forum or limited public forum, including denying such access or opportunity or discriminating for reasons based on the patriotic youth group's membership or leadership criteria or oath of allegiance to God and country. D. For the purposes of this section, "patriotic youth group" means any group or organization that meets all of the following: 1. Serves individuals who are under twenty-one years of age. 2. Has an educational purpose that promotes patriotism and civic involvement. 3. Is either: (a) listed in 36 United States Code, subtitle II, part B, chapter 301, 309, 311, 403, 709, 803, 1305, 1401 or 1541 on the effective date of this section. (b) The state affiliate of a group or organization described in subdivision (a) of this paragraph. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR MARCH 13, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE MARCH 13, 2026.